Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-185
Market agency, defined.

Market agency means any person engaged in the business of (1) buying or selling in commerce livestock on a commission basis or (2) furnishing stockyard services, meaning services or facilities furnished at a stockyard in connection with the receiving, buying, or selling on a commission basis or otherwise, marketing, feeding, watering, holding, delivering, shipping, weighing, or handling, in commerce, of livestock.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 16.